test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-lex_njihhood_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config: 
  hfst: 
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox: 
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - njihhoođ: # MLO checked
    njihhoođ+V+Inf: njihhoođ
    njihhoođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: njivom
    njihhoođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: njivoh
    njihhoođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njiho
    njihhoođ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: njihhoon
    njihhoođ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: njihovettee
    njihhoođ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: njihhoov
    njihhoođ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: njihhoop
    njihhoođ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: njihovetteđ
    njihhoođ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: njihoh
    njihhoođ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: njiihum
    njihhoođ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: njiihuh
    njihhoođ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: njivoi
    njihhoođ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: njivvoim
    njihhoođ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: njivvoid
    njihhoođ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: njivvoin
    njihhoođ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: njivvoim
    njihhoođ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: njivvoid
    njihhoođ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: njihhuu
    njihhoođ+V+Cond+Sg1: njivoččim
    njihhoođ+V+Cond+Sg2: njivoččih
    njihhoođ+V+Cond+Sg3: njivoččij
    njihhoođ+V+Cond+Du1: njivoččáim
    njihhoođ+V+Cond+Du2: njivoččáid
    njihhoođ+V+Cond+Du3: njivoččáin
    njihhoođ+V+Cond+Pl1: njivoččijm
    njihhoođ+V+Cond+Pl2: njivoččijd
    njihhoođ+V+Cond+Pl3: njivoččii
    njihhoođ+V+Pot+Sg1: njivvoom
    njihhoođ+V+Pot+Sg2: njivvooh
    njihhoođ+V+Pot+Sg3: njivvooš
    njihhoođ+V+Pot+Du1: njivožeen
    njihhoođ+V+Pot+Du2: njivvoošvettee
    njihhoođ+V+Pot+Du3: njivožává
    njihhoođ+V+Pot+Pl1: njivožep
    njihhoođ+V+Pot+Pl2: njivvoošvetteđ
    njihhoođ+V+Pot+Pl3: njivožeh
#    njihhoođ+V+Imprt+Sg1: njihhoom
    njihhoođ+V+Imprt+Sg2: njivo
    njihhoođ+V+Imprt+Sg3: njivos
    njihhoođ+V+Imprt+Du1: njihhoon
    njihhoođ+V+Imprt+Du2: njihhoo
    njihhoođ+V+Imprt+Du3: njihhoos
    njihhoođ+V+Imprt+Pl1: njihhoop
    njihhoođ+V+Imprt+Pl2: njihhoođ
    njihhoođ+V+Imprt+Pl3: njihhoos
    njihhoođ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: njivo
    njihhoođ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: njihhoom
    njihhoođ+V+Cond+ConNeg: njivoččii
    njihhoođ+V+Pot+ConNeg: njivvuu
    njihhoođ+V+PrsPrc: njihhoo
    njihhoođ+V+PrfPrc: njihhoom
    njihhoođ+V+Actio: njihhoom
    njihhoođ+V+Actio+Ess: njihomin
    njihhoođ+V+Actio+Loc: njihomist
    njihhoođ+V+Actio+Ill: njihomân
    njihhoođ+V+Actio+Com: njivodijn
    njihhoođ+V+VAbess: njivohánnáá


  Verb - orroođ: # MLO checked
    orroođ+V+Inf: orroođ
    orroođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: orom
    orroođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: oroh
    orroođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: oro
    orroođ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: orroon
    orroođ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: orovettee
    orroođ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: orroov
    orroođ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: orroop
    orroođ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: orovetteđ
    orroođ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: oroh
    orroođ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: uurrum
    orroođ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: uurruh
    orroođ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: oroi
    orroođ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: oroim
    orroođ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: oroid
    orroođ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: oroin
    orroođ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: oroim
    orroođ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: oroid
    orroođ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: urruu
    orroođ+V+Cond+Sg1: oroččim
    orroođ+V+Cond+Sg2: oroččih
    orroođ+V+Cond+Sg3: oroččij
    orroođ+V+Cond+Du1: oroččáim
    orroođ+V+Cond+Du2: oroččáid
    orroođ+V+Cond+Du3: oroččáin
    orroođ+V+Cond+Pl1: oroččijm
    orroođ+V+Cond+Pl2: oroččijd
    orroođ+V+Cond+Pl3: oroččii
    orroođ+V+Pot+Sg1: ooroom
    orroođ+V+Pot+Sg2: oorooh
    orroođ+V+Pot+Sg3: oorooš
    orroođ+V+Pot+Du1: orožeen
    orroođ+V+Pot+Du2: ooroošvettee
    orroođ+V+Pot+Du3: orožává
    orroođ+V+Pot+Pl1: orožep
    orroođ+V+Pot+Pl2: ooroošvetteđ
    orroođ+V+Pot+Pl3: orožeh
#    orroođ+V+Imprt+Sg1: orroom
    orroođ+V+Imprt+Sg2: oro
    orroođ+V+Imprt+Sg3: oros
    orroođ+V+Imprt+Du1: orroon
    orroođ+V+Imprt+Du2: orroo
    orroođ+V+Imprt+Du3: orroos
    orroođ+V+Imprt+Pl1: orroop
    orroođ+V+Imprt+Pl2: orroođ
    orroođ+V+Imprt+Pl3: orroos
    orroođ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: oro
    orroođ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: orroom
    orroođ+V+Cond+ConNeg: oroččii
    orroođ+V+Pot+ConNeg: urruu
    orroođ+V+PrsPrc: orroo
    orroođ+V+PrfPrc: orroom
    orroođ+V+Actio: orroom
    orroođ+V+Actio+Ess: oromin
    orroođ+V+Actio+Loc: oromist
    orroođ+V+Actio+Ill: oromân
    orroođ+V+Actio+Com: orodijn
    orroođ+V+VAbess: orohánnáá

  Verb - vahhoođ: # MLO checked
    vahhoođ+V+Inf: vahhoođ
    vahhoođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vavom
    vahhoođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: vavoh
    vahhoođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vaho
    vahhoođ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: vahhoon
    vahhoođ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: vahovettee
    vahhoođ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: vahhoov
    vahhoođ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: vahhoop
    vahhoođ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: vahovetteđ
    vahhoođ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: vahoh
    vahhoođ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: voohum
    vahhoođ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: voohuh
    vahhoođ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: vavoi
    vahhoođ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: vavvoim
    vahhoođ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: vavvoid
    vahhoođ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: vavvoin
    vahhoođ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: vavvoim
    vahhoođ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: vavvoid
    vahhoođ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: vohhuu
    vahhoođ+V+Cond+Sg1: vavoččim
    vahhoođ+V+Cond+Sg2: vavoččih
    vahhoođ+V+Cond+Sg3: vavoččij
    vahhoođ+V+Cond+Du1: vavoččáim
    vahhoođ+V+Cond+Du2: vavoččáid
    vahhoođ+V+Cond+Du3: vavoččáin
    vahhoođ+V+Cond+Pl1: vavoččijm
    vahhoođ+V+Cond+Pl2: vavoččijd
    vahhoođ+V+Cond+Pl3: vavoččii
    vahhoođ+V+Pot+Sg1: vavvoom
    vahhoođ+V+Pot+Sg2: vavvooh
    vahhoođ+V+Pot+Sg3: vavvooš
    vahhoođ+V+Pot+Du1: vavožeen
    vahhoođ+V+Pot+Du2: vavvoošvettee
    vahhoođ+V+Pot+Du3: vavožává
    vahhoođ+V+Pot+Pl1: vavožep
    vahhoođ+V+Pot+Pl2: vavvoošvetteđ
    vahhoođ+V+Pot+Pl3: vavožeh
#    vahhoođ+V+Imprt+Sg1: vahhoom
    vahhoođ+V+Imprt+Sg2: vavo
    vahhoođ+V+Imprt+Sg3: vavos
    vahhoođ+V+Imprt+Du1: vahhoon
    vahhoođ+V+Imprt+Du2: vahhoo
    vahhoođ+V+Imprt+Du3: vahhoos
    vahhoođ+V+Imprt+Pl1: vahhoop
    vahhoođ+V+Imprt+Pl2: vahhoođ
    vahhoođ+V+Imprt+Pl3: vahhoos
    vahhoođ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: vavo
    vahhoođ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: vahhoom
    vahhoođ+V+Cond+ConNeg: vavoččii
    vahhoođ+V+Pot+ConNeg: vovvuu
    vahhoođ+V+PrsPrc: vahhoo
    vahhoođ+V+PrfPrc: vahhoom
    vahhoođ+V+Actio: vahhoom
    vahhoođ+V+Actio+Ess: vahomin
    vahhoođ+V+Actio+Loc: vahomist
    vahhoođ+V+Actio+Ill: vahomân
    vahhoođ+V+Actio+Com: vavodijn
    vahhoođ+V+VAbess: vavohánnáá
